Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,555,245 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Mortuary
and Cemetery Board.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,176,829 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Board of
Naturopathic Medicine.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $797,539
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,828,620 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Board of Medical
Imaging.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,332,798 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the State Board of
Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,940,027 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon State
Veterinary Medical Examining Board.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5524 (SB 5524-A) Page 1
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 6, chapter 62,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board, is  increased
by $31,500, for legal expenses.
SECTION 8.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5524 (SB 5524-A) Page 2